Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8713
Act; cumulative to other law.

The prohibition in the Patient Safety Improvement Act against discovery, disclosure, or admission into evidence of patient safety work product is in addition to any other protections provided by law.

Laws 2005, LB 361, § 13.